Hawaii, session 2025, GM1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that business and
commerce continue to grow more complicated, increasing the need
for well-gualified certified public accountants in the State and
nationwide. At the same time, however, a declining percentage
of students in accounting classes are pursuing certified public
accountant (CPA) licenses. In part, this decline is due to the
reguirement of thirty additional semester hours of education,
beyond the requirements of a bachelor's degree, to obtain a CPA
license. The time and monetary costs of this additional
education can be a serious obstacle for many students. Thus,
the additional education requirement effectively blocks many
potential candidates from obtaining CPA licenses, at a time when
more qualified CPAs are needed.
The purpose of this Act is to generate more qualified CPAs
by establishing alternative pathways to licensure that eliminate
certain barriers for eligible applicants.
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. 1291
S.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 466-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) through (d) to read as
follows:
" (a) A license and a permit are required to practice
public accountancy. The board may license and grant the
designation of "certified public accountant" to any person who
has met the following:
(1) Attained eighteen years of age;
(2) Possesses a history of competence, trustworthiness,
and fair dealing;
(3) Educational requirements of this section [ef—section
4-66-5^] ;
(4) [E-xper-ionce-requirements of] Completed two years of
professional experience meeting the requirements in
subsection (d);
(5) Examination requirements of subsection (e); and
(6) Paid the appropriate fees and assessments.
(b) The educational requirement for a license shall
include a baccalaureate degree conferred by a college or
university recognized by the board with at least eighteen
semester hours of upper division or graduate level accounting or
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO. 1291
S.D. 1
auditing subjects as determined by rules adopted by the board
pursuant to chapter 91, and:
(1) Completion of not less than thirty semester hours of
study in addition to those semester hours required for
a baccalaureate degree -- The- baccalauroate—degree and
the thirty somcGtcr hours of—additional'" study shall
include a minimum of -cightecft- semester hours--of upper
dlviseen or graduate Icve-l-aeeounting or auditing
subjects.-- The]; provided that the content of the
additional qualifying hours of study shall be
determined by rules adopted by the board pursuant to
chapter 91; or
(2) [If the applicant has--a-m-inimum of oeghtecn ecmestcr-
hours of upper- division or graduate level aceeunting
and auditing-subjects-;—the- ■applicant—may—elect-te
replace the thirty semcote-r 'hours wi-th an additional
thirty months of professional- ocpori-ence—in e pub-l-te
accounting practice.—This] In lieu of the thirty
semester hours described in paragraph (1), the
applicant may demonstrate completion of an additional
tAV£lye jnontds of prof£s sLonal ex£erienc£iu}y^
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx 3

Page 4 S.B. NO. 1291
S.D. 1
practice of public accounting only; provided that this
experience shall not be credited toward the experience
requirements in subsection [44}-r] (a) (4) .
(c) A person shall be exempt from the requirements in
subsection (b) [er section 466-5.5] if that person:
(1) Holds a current license as a public accountant under
section 466-6; or
(2) Holds, and has continued to hold, a valid comparable
certificate, registration, or license of certified
public accountant of another state for a period of not
less than ten years preceding the date of the person's
application under this section, and has been in active
practice of public accountancy in one or more states
for a period of not less than five years preceding the
date of the application.
(d) Each applicant shall present satisfactory evidence in
the form of a certified statement from present or former
employer (s) that the applicant has [mot one-of ■■ tho ■ following
cxpcrioncG requirements-for 1-iccnDc:
44-)- Complretion e-f—onc' theusand ■five—hund-r^ed chargeable
hours in the porfo-rmancc of -audits involv-iftg-the
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx


Page 5 S.B. NO. -1
applieation—goncrallyacceptedaccounting
pri-neiplcs-and auditing standards carncd-whi-lc in
public ■■aeeeu-Htreg—practice;—er
4-34- Compl-etion -ef-two -years of] completed the required
professional experience in public accountancy practice
as defined in section 466-3. Completion of experience
in private or government accounting or auditing work,
deemed by the board to be equivalent to professional
experience in public accountancy practice as defined
in section 466-3, may be substituted for all or part
of the two years of professional experience in public
accounting practice[—] required in subsection (a)(4).
The nature, variety, and depth of acceptable private
or government accounting or auditing experience shall
be defined by the board in its rules."
SECTION 3. Section 466-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["§466-5.5—Eduoational roquircmonts for lioonouro
effective Doocanber-S-l-—2-000-----Effective- Docombor—S-It—2000,—a«
applicant for lieensure-shall- -have-at least ono-hundred-fifty
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO. 1291
S.D. 1
ocmoDtc-r^hours of college education.-----Within the
onc-hundred-fifty scmcGter hou-eo-;—the appl-icanfe shell hav-e-:-
-Hr)- A bacceleurcate or higher degree conferred-by e
college or university ecccpteble to--th-c board;—and
4-2-)- An accounting concentration or its cguivalent- as
specified in the rules of -the—board;
except that applicants ^or licensure who—have—auccessfully
completed the Uniform Cortifiod-Public-AGCountant---Exantination
before—December -31,—2000,—or held conditional— eredit ■ before
December 31,—2000,—and subsequently complctod ■ the-ex-amination
before the conditional credit expired,—may continue—te-meot the
edueattena^^-reguiremeftts—of—seetien—4-tt—t-(-b)-r" ]
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5, This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-1773 SB1291 SDl SMA.docx

S.B. NO. -1
APPROVED this Wth day of April ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B.No. 1291, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: March 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: MAR 3 1, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2025.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
797